Georgia statutes. TITLE 2 Agriculture
Article 3 Agricultural Commodity Commission for Peanuts
2-8-63.
Finding of assent or approval of producers required for marketing order to become effective; commission authorized to issue orders regulating peanuts; amendments; notice; rules and regulations; expiration and extension of orders.

No marketing order or major amendment thereto, directly affecting producers or producer marketing, issued pursuant to this article, shall be made effective by the commission until the finding of one or more of the following:

That such marketing order or amendment thereto has been assented to in writing by not less than 65 percent of the producers who are engaged within the area specified in such marketing order or amendment thereto in the production for market or the producer marketing of not less than 51 percent of the peanuts specified therein in commercial quantities;

That such marketing order or amendment thereto has been assented to in writing by producers who produce not less than 65 percent of the volume of peanuts and by 51 percent of the total number of producers so engaged; or

That such marketing order or amendment thereto has been approved or favored by producers in a referendum among producers directly affected if the valid votes cast in such referendum in favor of such marketing order or amendment thereto represent not less than 51 percent of the total number of producers of peanuts of record with the commission who marketed not less than 51 percent of the total quantity of the peanuts marketed in the next preceding marketing season by the total number of producers of record with the commission.

Whenever any marketing order or any major amendment to any marketing order is issued by the commission, the commission shall determine whether assent, approval, or favor thereto of the producers shall be by written assents or by referendum.

If the commission determines that a referendum shall be had, the commission shall establish a referendum period of 30 days. At the close of such referendum period, the commission shall count and tabulate the ballots filed during such period. If from such tabulation the commission finds that the number of producers voting in favor of such marketing order or amendment thereto is not less than 51 percent of the total number of producers of record with the commission and that such producers who voted in favor of the marketing order or amendment thereto marketed not less than 51 percent of the total volume of peanuts marketed by all producers of record with the commission during the marketing season next preceding such referendum, the commission may make such marketing order or amendment thereto effective. The commission is authorized to prescribe such additional procedures as may be necessary to conduct such referendum.

At a public hearing held to consider a proposed marketing order or major amendments to an existing marketing order which directly affect producers or producer marketing, the commission shall also receive testimony or evidence from which it can determine whether the assent, approval, or favor of such producers shall be determined by written assents or by referendum as prescribed in this Code section. Upon the conclusion of any hearing which involves a marketing order or a major amendment thereto directly affecting producers or producer marketing, the commission shall make a finding, based upon the testimony and evidence received, whether producer assent, approval, or favor shall be determined by written assents or by referendum. If the commission finds that a referendum shall be had, it shall direct that a referendum be held in accordance with this subsection.

Any referendum or assent in writing to a marketing order under paragraphs (3), (5), and (6) of subsection (a) of Code Section 2-8-62 shall be held pursuant to this Code section; and upon the approval thereof by two-thirds of those voting therein, where the total vote cast thereon represents not less than 25 percent of those eligible to vote or where the total vote cast thereon represents not less than 25 percent of the total amount of peanuts, such marketing order may be declared by the commission to be approved.

In the event of the failure of any proposed marketing order to be approved, no additional referendum thereon shall be held during a period of 12 months from the date of the close of the previous referendum period.

Subject to the provisions, restrictions, and limitations imposed in this article, the commission may issue marketing orders regulating producer marketing and the processing, distributing, or handling in any manner of peanuts by any and all persons engaged in such producer marketing, processing, distributing, or handling of peanuts within this state.

Upon the recommendation of not less than three members of the commission, the commission may make effective minor amendments to a marketing order. The commission may require a public hearing upon minor amendments if in its opinion the substance of such minor amendments so warrants. The commission, however, shall not be required to submit minor amendments for written assents or referendum approval.

In making effective major amendments to a marketing order, the commission shall follow the same procedures prescribed in this article for the institution of a marketing order. For the purpose of this article, a major amendment to a marketing order shall include, but shall not be limited to, any amendment which adds to or deletes from any such marketing order any of the following types of regulations or authorizations:

Authority for regulating the period or periods during which peanuts or any grade, size, or quality of such peanuts may be processed, distributed, or otherwise marketed within this state;

Authority for the establishment of uniform grading and inspection of peanuts and the establishment of grading standards of quality, condition, size, or pack of such peanuts;

Authority for the establishment of plans for advertising and sales promotion of peanuts;

Authority to prohibit unfair trade practices;

Authority for carrying out research studies in the production, processing, or distribution of peanuts;

Authority to increase an assessment rate beyond the maximum rate authorized by the marketing order in effect; or

Authority to extend the application of the provisions of any marketing order to portions or uses of peanuts not previously subject to such provisions or to restrict or extend the application of such provisions upon the producers or handlers of such portions or uses of such peanuts.

Modification of any provisions of any marketing order in effect, for the purpose of clarifying the meaning or application of such provisions or of modifying administrative procedures for carrying out such provisions, are declared not to be a major amendment of such marketing order.

Upon the issuance of any order making effective a marketing order or any suspension, amendment, or termination thereof, a notice thereof shall be posted on a public bulletin board maintained at the offices of the commission; and a copy of such notice shall be published as the commission may prescribe. No marketing order nor any suspension, amendment, or termination thereof shall become effective until the termination of a period of five days from the date of such posting and publication. It shall also be the duty of the commission to mail a copy of the notice of such issuance to all persons directly affected by the terms of such marketing order, suspension, amendment, or termination whose names and addresses are on file in the office of the commission and to every person who files in the office of the commission a written request for such notice.

The commission shall have the power, consistent with this article and in accordance with marketing orders and agreements made effective under this article, to establish such general rules and regulations for uniform application to all marketing orders issued under this article as may be necessary to facilitate the administration and enforcement of such marketing orders. The provisions of subsection (d) of this Code section relative to posting, publication, and time of taking effect shall be applicable to any such general rule or regulation established pursuant to this subsection and applicable to marketing orders generally. Such notice shall be furnished by the commission for each marketing order in active operation.

The commission shall have the power, consistent with this article, to establish administrative rules and regulations for each marketing order issued and made effective as may be necessary to facilitate the supervision, administration, and enforcement of each such order. The provisions of subsection (d) of this Code section relative to posting, publication, mailing of notice, and time of taking effect shall be applicable to any such administrative rules and regulations.

Unless extended as provided in this Code section, all marketing orders issued under the authority of this article shall expire, terminate, and become of no force and effect at the expiration of three years from the date of the issuance of the original marketing order or, if such marketing order has been extended, at the expiration of three years after the date of any such extension.

In the event either one of the following conditions is complied with, a marketing order shall be extended for a period of three years after the date of its original expiration:

Assent has been given in writing to such marketing order by not less than two-thirds of the producers participating; or

Approval or favor of such marketing order has been given by producers in a referendum among producers directly affected if at least 66 2/3 percent of the votes cast in such referendum favor the extension of such marketing order.

If the commission determines that a referendum shall be held, the commission shall establish a referendum period of 30 days, such referendum period to terminate at least 30 days prior to the expiration date of the marketing order which is the subject of such referendum. At the close of such referendum period, the commission shall count and tabulate the ballots cast during such period. If from such tabulation the commission finds that the number of producers voting in favor of the extension of such marketing order is not less than 66 2/3 percent of the total number of ballots cast, then such marketing order shall be extended for a period of three years after the expiration date. If it is found from the tabulation of such referendum that the number of producers who had voted in favor of the extension of such marketing order is less than the required 66 2/3 percent of the total number of ballots cast, then the marketing order shall expire, terminate, and be of no force and effect as provided in subsection (g) of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-8-63

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1.

2-8-64.
Limiting of application of marketing order to certain marketing areas or portions of state.

Marketing orders issued by the commission under this article may be limited in their application by prescribing the marketing areas or portions of the state in which a particular order shall be effective, provided that no marketing order shall be issued by the commission unless it embraces all persons of a like class who are engaged in a specific and distinctive agricultural industry or trade within this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-8-64

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1.

2-8-65.
Seasonal marketing regulations; legislative findings; interpretation of Code section.

The commission without prior notice to and public hearing for the producers or handlers of the peanuts directly affected, may issue and make effective seasonal marketing regulations or modifications thereof, provided that the marketing order, made effective after due notice, public hearing, and written assent as required by this article, (1) provides for the issuance or modification of such seasonal marketing regulations without requiring such prior notice and public hearing, and (2) sets forth the limits within which such seasonal marketing regulations may be made effective or subsequently modified by the commission; and provided, further, that the commission finds that such seasonal marketing regulations or modifications thereof are reasonable and proper and a practical means of carrying out the marketing provisions authorized in such marketing order or agreement and will effectuate the declared purposes and policies of this article with respect to peanuts. Notice of the issuance and the effective date of any such seasonal marketing regulations or modifications thereof shall be given by the commission to all producers and handlers directly affected by any such regulations in the manner and within the time specified in the applicable marketing order or, in absence of such, as may be specified by the commission or as specified in the administrative rules and regulations made effective for such marketing order pursuant to subsection (f) of Code Section 2-8-63.

It is recognized that with respect to some peanuts, marketing, weather, and other conditions may change so rapidly as to require changes in seasonal marketing regulations from week to week or more often. It is intended that this Code section be interpreted liberally so that the commission may be enabled to carry out the marketing regulations and procedures authorized in this Code section in a practical and effective manner.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-8-65

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1.

2-8-66.
Applicability of orders regulating minimum quality, condition, size, or maturity.

Whenever producers or handlers of peanuts regulated by a marketing order issued by the commission pursuant to this article are required to comply with minimum quality, condition, size, or maturity regulations, no person, except as otherwise provided in such order, shall process, distribute, or otherwise handle any of such peanuts from any source, whether produced within or outside this state, which peanuts do not meet such minimum requirements applicable to producers or handlers of such peanuts in this state, provided that such regulations shall not apply to any peanuts which have been produced outside of this state and are in transit on the effective date of the regulations.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-8-66

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1.

2-8-67.
Assessments to defray expenses of marketing orders; budgets for administration; authority to borrow money; contributions in lieu of advance deposits; collection of assessments; rules; enforcement of payment; deposit and disbursement of moneys; investment of moneys.

For the purpose of providing funds to defray the necessary expenses incurred by the commission in the formulation, issuance, administration, and enforcement of each marketing order issued under this article, each such marketing order shall provide for the levying and collection of assessments in sufficient amounts to defray such expenses. Each marketing order shall indicate the maximum rate of any such assessment which may be collected and the proportion, if any, payable by each producer and handler directly regulated or affected by such marketing order. In administering such marketing order, the commission shall adopt, from time to time, budgets to cover necessary expenses and the assessment rate necessary to provide sufficient funds. If the commission finds that each such budget and assessment rate are proper and equitable and will provide sufficient moneys to defray the necessary expenses, it may approve such budget and rate of assessment and order that each producer and handler so assessed shall pay to the commission, at such times and in such installments as the commission may prescribe, an assessment, based upon the units in which peanuts are marketed or upon any other uniform basis which the commission determines to be reasonable and equitable, but in amounts which (1) in the case of producers will not exceed 2 1/2 percent of the gross dollar volume of sales of the peanuts affected by all such producers regulated by such marketing order, or (2) in the case of processors, distributors, or other handlers will not exceed 2 1/2 percent of the gross dollar volume of purchases of peanuts affected by the marketing order from producers or of the gross dollar volume of sales of peanuts affected by the marketing order and handled by all such processors, distributors, or other handlers regulated by such marketing order during the marketing season or seasons during which such marketing order is effective.

Each marketing order which authorizes the carrying out of advertising and sales promotion plans shall provide for the levying and collection of assessments in sufficient amounts to defray the expenses of such activities. Each such marketing order shall indicate the maximum rate of any such assessment and the proportion, if any, payable by each producer and handler directly regulated or affected by such marketing order. The commission shall adopt budgets to cover such expenses and establish the assessment rate necessary to provide sufficient funds. If the commission finds that each such budget and assessment rate are proper and equitable and will provide sufficient moneys to defray such expenses, they may approve such budget and approve and levy such assessment. Any assessments so established shall be based upon the units in which peanuts are marketed or upon any other uniform basis which the commission determines to be proper and equitable. Any assessment rates established under this subsection shall be in amounts not to exceed 4 percent of the gross dollar volume of sales by all producers or by all processors, distributors, or other handlers of peanuts regulated by such marketing order during the marketing season or seasons during which such marketing order is effective.

In lieu of the assessments to defray the costs of formulation, issuance, administration, and enforcement of the marketing order and of advertising or sales promotion provided for in subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section, if the marketing order contains provisions for advertising or sales promotion as authorized in this article, the commission may approve and fix one assessment not exceeding 6 1/2 percent of the gross dollar volume of sales of such peanuts by all producers or by all processors, distributors, or other handlers of such peanuts regulated by such marketing order during the marketing season or seasons during which such marketing order is effective. The method and manner of assessment and collection thereof and the limitations and restrictions applicable thereupon shall conform in all respects with subsection (b) of this Code section, except as to the maximum amount of such assessment. In such case, the commission shall approve the proportions of such assessments which may be expended to defray the costs of formulation, issuance, administration, and enforcement of the marketing order and of such advertising or sales promotion program, provided that the proportion of such assessments which may be allocated in such manner to defray the cost of such administrative activities for such marketing order shall in no case exceed the maximum amount authorized in subsection (a) of this Code section.

In the event that the commission has reason to believe that the administration of a marketing order will be facilitated or the attainment of the purposes and objectives of the marketing order will be promoted thereby, the commission is authorized to borrow money, with or without interest, to carry out any provision of any marketing order authorized by this article and may hypothecate anticipated assessment collections applicable to such respective provisions.

In lieu of requiring advance deposits for defraying administrative or advertising and sales promotion expenses until such time as sufficient moneys are collected for such purposes from the payment of assessments established pursuant to this Code section, the commission is authorized to receive and disburse for such purposes contributions made by producers, processors, distributors, or other handlers. The commission shall not be held responsible for the repayment of such contributions, provided that whenever collections from the payment of established assessments credited to the respective marketing order accounts are sufficient so to warrant, the commission shall repay contributions or shall authorize the application of such contributions to the assessment obligations of the persons who made such contributions.

Each and every handler of peanuts for which an assessment has been established by or pursuant to this article shall, at the time of purchase of any such peanuts from the producer thereof, collect from such producer the assessment established by or in accordance with this article and remit the same to the commission. The liability of such handler under this article shall not be discharged except upon receipt of such sums by the commission. For the purpose of this subsection, to ensure compliance with this Code section, and for the administrative convenience of the commission in enforcing payment and collection of such assessments, delivery by a producer to a handler for processing of any peanuts upon which an assessment has been established shall be deemed a sale of such peanuts within the meaning of this Code section; and the assessment shall thereupon attach and become due, regardless of whether such handler actually purchases such peanuts for himself or only processes same for a consideration payable by the producer or another person and such peanuts are thereafter sold to another person, provided that upon collection of such assessment by the handler to whom such peanuts are so delivered for processing only, no further or additional assessment shall attach or become due by reason of the subsequent sale by such producer of such processed peanuts to another person or handler.

The commission may prescribe such rules as may be necessary and reasonable for the orderly reporting and transmitting of assessments by handlers and may take all legal action necessary to enforce payment of the same by handlers. The commission is authorized to issue executions for the same in like manner as executions are issued for ad valorem property taxes due the state. It shall be the duty of each and every sheriff of this state and their lawful deputies, upon the request of the commission, to levy and collect such executions and to make their return thereof to the commission in like manner as such tax executions are levied and return thereof made to county tax collectors and tax commissioners. The commission shall likewise be authorized to collect, by execution as provided in this subsection or otherwise, directly from the producer against whom any assessment levied under this Code section may be found due whenever it is determined that such producer has sold such affected peanuts giving rise to such liability to a person other than to a handler who has collected such assessment and is required by this Code section to remit the same to the commission. Furthermore, the commission may proceed against such producer and the purchaser of such peanuts simultaneously if the purchaser is a handler required to collect such assessment, until satisfaction is obtained.

Any moneys collected by the commission pursuant to this article shall be deposited in a bank or other depository approved by the commission and shall be disbursed by the commission only for the necessary expenses incurred by the commission, as approved by the commission. Funds so collected shall be deposited and disbursed in conformity with appropriate rules and regulations prescribed by the commission. All such expenditures by the commission shall be audited at least annually by the state auditor and a copy of such audit shall be delivered within 30 days after the completion thereof to the Governor and the commission. If the commission is abolished, any funds remaining in its hands at such time shall be used to pay the existing obligations of the commission and the expenses incurred in winding up the affairs of the commission. Any excess remaining shall escheat to the state and shall be paid into the state treasury as unclaimed trust funds.

Moneys deposited by the commission pursuant to this Code section which the commission determines are available for investment may be invested or reinvested by the commission as provided for funds of this state or of any retirement system created by law, provided that all moneys invested shall be invested in those areas of production that will provide a return at the highest bank interest rate available. It shall be the duty of the commission annually to review these investments and determine whether they are in compliance with this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-8-67

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1.

2-8-68.
Assessment constitutes personal debt; action for collection; fee for late payment; remedies cumulative.

Any assessment levied or established in accordance with this article in such specified amount as may be determined by the commission pursuant to this article shall constitute a personal debt of every person so assessed and shall be due and payable to the commission when payment is called for by the commission. In the event of the failure of such person to pay any such assessment upon the date determined by the commission, the commission may file an action against such person in a court of competent jurisdiction for the collection thereof.

In the event that any producer or handler duly assessed pursuant to this article fails to pay to the commission the amount so assessed on or before the date specified by the commission, the commission is authorized to add to such unpaid assessment an amount not exceeding 10 percent of such unpaid assessment to defray the cost of enforcing the collection of such unpaid assessment.

The provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section with respect to collection of assessments by action are in addition to and cumulative of the provisions of this article authorizing the issuance of executions for assessments by the commission. The 10 percent penalty authorized to be assessed upon delinquent assessments under subsection (b) of this Code section may likewise be included in any execution issued by the commission. Such remedies may be pursued concurrently until satisfaction is obtained upon either. Any penalty recovered shall become a part of the principal assessment levied and shall be for the use of the commission as are other moneys received under this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-8-68

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1.

2-8-69.
Books and records of processors and distributors; furnishing information to commission; inspection of books and records; confidentiality; enforcement.

The commission may require any and all processors or distributors subject to the provisions of any marketing order issued pursuant to this article:

To maintain books and records reflecting their operations under the marketing order;

To furnish to the commission or its duly authorized or designated representatives such information as may from time to time be requested by them relating to operations under the marketing order; and

To permit inspection by the commission or its duly authorized or designated representatives of such portions of such books and records as relate to operations under the marketing order.

Information obtained by any person under this Code section shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed by him to any other person, except to a person with like right to obtain the information or to any attorney employed to give legal advice thereupon or by court order.

In order to carry out the purposes of this Code section, the commission may hold hearings, take testimony, administer oaths, subpoena witnesses, and issue subpoenas for the production of books, records, or documents of any kind.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-8-69

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1.

2-8-70.
Use of designations of grade, quality, or condition without complying with regulations or marketing order.

Whenever the use by a producer or handler of a particular emblem, label, certificate, or other distinctive designation of grade, quality, or condition, other than grade or other quality designations then in effect pursuant to state or federal grade standards, is made contingent upon compliance with certain production or handling regulations authorized by a marketing order issued and made effective under this article, it shall be unlawful and a violation of this article for any person who is not participating in and complying with such order or regulations to use such designation of grade, quality, or condition.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-8-70

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1.

2-8-71.
Entry and inspection of premises to check compliance with marketing order; holding of lot of peanuts to ascertain compliance; affixing of notice of noncompliance; service of notice of noncompliance; correction of deficiencies; disposal of lot; applicability.

Any authorized inspector or other authorized person discharging his duties in the checking of compliance with any marketing order made effective pursuant to this article may enter during normal business hours and inspect any premises, enclosure, building, or conveyance where he has reason to believe any peanuts subject to a marketing order are produced, stored, being prepared for market, or marketed and may inspect or cause to be inspected such representative samples of the peanuts as may be necessary to determine whether or not any lot of such peanuts is in compliance with applicable regulations of any marketing order made effective pursuant to this article.

Any authorized inspector or other authorized person in the discharge of his duties, if he has reason to believe that a lot of any peanuts subject to a marketing order issued under this article is not in compliance with the requirements of such marketing order or of marketing rules and regulations issued pursuant thereto, as to quality, condition, size, maturity, pack, labeling, or markings, may hold such lot for a reasonable period of time sufficient to enable such officer to ascertain by an authorized inspection whether such lot complies with such marketing requirements, but in any event not to exceed 72 hours, except as provided in this Code section.

Following inspection, an inspector or other authorized person may affix to any lot which is determined to be in noncompliance an official notice, warning tag, or other appropriate marking warning that the lot is held and stating the reasons therefor. It shall be unlawful for any person, other than an authorized inspector or enforcing officer, to detach, alter, deface, or destroy any such official notice, warning tag, or marking so affixed to any such lot or to remove or dispose of such lot in any manner or under conditions other than as prescribed in such notice of noncompliance, except upon written permission of an authorized enforcing officer or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

The commission or the authorized person by whom such lot is being held shall serve the person in possession of such lot with a notice of noncompliance. Such notice shall be served in person or by mail to the last known address of the person in possession. It shall be the duty of the person in possession to notify the owner of the lot or other persons having an interest therein of the serving of such notice of noncompliance.

Such notice of noncompliance shall include a description of the lot and the place where and reasons for which it is held and shall cite the applicable marketing order or marketing rules and regulations and the Code section upon which the notice of noncompliance is based.

The owner of a lot shall have not more than 72 hours from the time of the service of a notice of noncompliance for reconditioning or for the correction of the deficiencies noted in the notice of noncompliance. If such lot is reconditioned or the deficiencies are corrected, the enforcing officer shall remove the warning tags or markings and release the lot for marketing, provided that with the consent of the owner of the lot, the enforcing officer is authorized to divert the lot to other lawful uses or to destroy the lot.

If the owner of the lot fails or refuses to give consent to its diversion to other lawful uses or to its destruction or if the lot has not been reconditioned or the deficiencies otherwise corrected so as to bring the lot into compliance within the time specified in the notice, then the enforcing officer shall proceed as provided in this subsection.

The commission may file a verified petition in the superior court of the county where the peanuts are held or the county of the residence of the owner thereof requesting permission to divert such lot to any other available lawful use or to destroy such lot. Such verified petition shall show the condition of the lot; that the lot is situated within the territorial jurisdiction of the court in which the petition is being filed or that the owner thereof resides within the jurisdiction of the court; that the lot is held and the notice of noncompliance has been served as provided in this Code section; that the lot has not been reconditioned as required; the name and address of the owner and the person in possession of the lot; and that the owner has refused permission to divert or to destroy the lot. Upon the filing of such verified petition the court may issue an order to show cause, returnable five days after service upon the owner, why the lot shall not be reconditioned or the deficiencies corrected or why the lot shall not be diverted to other lawful uses or destroyed. The owner of the lot may, prior to the date when the order to show cause is returnable, either recondition or correct the deficiencies in the lot so as to bring the lot into compliance or file at or before the hearing on the order an answer with the court showing why the lot should not be reconditioned or the deficiencies corrected so as to bring it into compliance or showing why the lot should not be diverted to other lawful uses or destroyed.

If, at the expiration of the five days, the owner of the lot has failed or refused to recondition or to correct the deficiencies so as to bring the lot into compliance, the court may enter judgment ordering that the lot be reconditioned, diverted to any other lawful uses, or destroyed in the manner directed by the court or that the lot be relabeled or otherwise processed or that the lot be sold or released upon such condition as the court in its discretion may impose, provided that the lot may not be sold or released into the regular channels of trade.

In the event of the sale of any lot by order of the court, the costs of storage, handling, and reconditioning or disposal shall be deducted from the proceeds of the sale and the balance, if any, shall be paid into the court for the account of the owner of any such lot.

Disposal of any lot or portion of any lot pursuant to this Code section, whether such disposal is by arrangement with an enforcing officer or by court order, shall not waive any of the penalty provisions of this article.

This Code section shall apply to any lot of peanuts regulated by a marketing order wherever or in the possession of whomever such lot may be in the marketing channels within this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-8-71

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1.

2-8-72.
Civil penalty; fixing amount of penalty; civil action; disposition of moneys.

Any person who violates any provision of this article or any marketing order duly issued by the commission and in effect under this article or who violates any rule or regulation issued by the commission pursuant to this article or of any marketing order duly issued and effective under this article shall be civilly liable to the commission for a penalty in an amount not to exceed $500.00 for each and every violation thereof, the amount of such penalty to be fixed by the commission after notice and hearing as provided by Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” for contested cases and recoverable by a civil action brought in the name of the commission or by execution issued in like manner as for assessments provided by Code Section 2-8-67. Any moneys recovered pursuant to this Code section shall be deposited and disbursed in accordance with subsection (e) of Code Section 2-8-67 as are other moneys.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-8-72

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1.

2-8-73.
Action by Attorney General for civil penalties or injunctive relief; remedies court may impose; payment of costs.

The Attorney General of this state shall, upon complaint by the commission, or may, upon his own initiative if after examination of the complaint and evidence he believes a violation has occurred, bring an action in the superior court in the name of the commission for civil penalties or for injunctive relief, including specific performance of any obligation imposed by a marketing order or any rule or regulation issued under this article, or both, against any person violating any provisions of this article or of any marketing order or any rule or regulation duly issued by the commission under this article.

If it appears to the court, upon any application for a temporary restraining order, upon the hearing of any order to show cause why a preliminary injunction should not be issued, or upon the hearing of any motion for a preliminary injunction, or if the court finds in any such action that any defendant therein is violating or has violated any provision of this article or of any marketing order or any rule or regulation duly issued by the commission under this article, then the court shall enjoin the defendant from committing further violations and may compel specific performance of any obligation imposed by a marketing order or any rule or regulation issued by the commission under this article. It shall not be necessary in such event to allege or prove lack of an adequate remedy at law.

In any action brought by the Attorney General to enforce any of the provisions of this article or of any marketing order issued by the commission and effective under this article or of any rule or regulation issued by the commission pursuant to any marketing order, the judgment, if in favor of the commission, may provide that the defendant pay to the commission the costs incurred by the commission in the prosecution of such action.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-8-73

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1.